Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1519.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 635.1(a) of the act of May 17, 1921 (P.L.682, No.284), known as The Insurance Company Law of 1921, is amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 635.1. Mental Illness Coverage.--(a) As used in this section:(1) "Serious mental illness" means [any of the following mental illnesses as defined by the American Psychiatric 12345678910111213141516171819202122 Association in the most recent edition of the Diagnostic and Statistical Manual: schizophrenia, bipolar disorder, obsessive-compulsive disorder, major depressive disorder, panic disorder, anorexia nervosa, bulimia nervosa, schizoaffective disorder and delusional disorder.] a mental illness, disorder or condition included in the following classes of mental disorders designated in the American Psychiatric Association's Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders, Fifth Edition, Text Revision, 2022 (DSM-5-TR):(i) Schizophrenia spectrum and other psychotic disorders.(ii) Bipolar and related disorders.(iii) Depressive disorders.(iv) Anxiety disorders.(v) Obsessive-compulsive and related disorders.(vi) Feeding and eating disorders.[(2) "Health insurance policy" means any group health, sickness or accident policy or subscriber contract or certificate issued by an entity subject to one (1) of the following:(i) This act.(ii) The act of December 29, 1972 (P.L.1701, No.364), known as the "Health Maintenance Organization Act."(iii) 40 Pa.C.S. Ch. 61 (relating to hospital plan corporations) or 63 (relating to professional health services plan corporations).](3) "Mental health medication" means a medication which is approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration and used for treatment of a serious mental illness.(4) "Health insurer" means as defined in section 2702.(5) "MA or CHIP managed care plan" means as defined in 20250HB1519PN1775 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 section 2102.(6) "Prior authorization" means as defined in section 2102.* * *(c.1) A health insurer or MA or CHIP managed care plan may not, as a condition of coverage for a mental health medication, require prior authorization.* * *Section 2. This act shall apply as follows:(1) For a health insurance policy for which either rates or forms are required to be filed with the Insurance Department, the amendment of section 635.1 of the act shall apply to a policy for which a form or rate is first filed on or after the effective date of this paragraph.(2) For a health insurance policy for which neither rates nor forms are required to be filed with the Insurance Department, the amendment of section 635.1 of the act shall apply to a policy issued or renewed on or after 180 days after the effective date of this paragraph.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1519PN1775 - 3 - 12345678910111213141516171819